California, session 20252026, AB1948.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 26220 of the Penal Code is amended to read:26220. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a license issued pursuant to Section 26150 or 26155 is valid for any period of time not to exceed three years from the date of the license.(b) If the licensee’s place of employment or business was the basis for issuance of a license pursuant to Section 26150, the license is valid for any period of time not to exceed 90 days from the date of the license, unless the license was issued pursuant to subdivision (c). The license shall be valid only in the county in which the license was originally issued. The licensee shall give a copy of this license to the licensing authority of the city, county, or city and county in which the licensee resides. The licensing authority that originally issued the license shall inform the licensee verbally and in writing in at least 16-point type of this obligation to give a copy of the license to the licensing authority of the city, county, or city and county of residence. Any application to renew or extend the validity of, or reissue, the license may be granted only upon the concurrence of the licensing authority that originally issued the license and the licensing authority of the city, county, or city and county in which the licensee resides.(c) A new or renewal license issued pursuant to Section 26150 or 26155 is valid for any period of time not to exceed four years from the date of the license if the license is issued to a custodial officer who is an employee of the sheriff as provided in Section 831.5, except that the license shall be invalid upon the conclusion of the person’s employment pursuant to Section 831.5 if the four-year period has not otherwise expired or any other condition imposed pursuant to this article does not limit the validity of the new or renewal license to a shorter time period.(d) A new or renewal license issued pursuant to Section 26170 to a peace officer appointed pursuant to Section 830.6 is valid for any period of time not to exceed four years from the date of the license, except that the license shall be invalid upon the conclusion of the person’s appointment pursuant to Section 830.6 if the four-year period has not otherwise expired or any other condition imposed pursuant to this article does not limit the validity of the new or renewal license to a shorter time period.